District of Columbia statutes.
3-1307

Reports.

The Board shall make an annual report in writing to the Mayor no later than December 31st of each year for the preceding fiscal year. This annual report shall include a statement of the receipts and disbursements of the Board, a summary of its activities, and any additional information and recommendations which the Board may deem of value to the Mayor or which the Mayor may request. The Board shall also make such additional reports as the Mayor may reasonably request.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2507.